Washington statutes.
RCW 25.12.050

Renewal of limited partnership.

A limited partnership may be continued or renewed by making, acknowledging, filing, and publishing a certificate thereof, in the manner provided in this chapter for the formation of such partnership originally, and every such partnership, not renewed or continued as herein provided, from and after the expiration thereof according to the original certificate, shall be a general partnership.

[ 1955 c 15 s 25.12.050. Prior: 1869 p 381 s 5; RRS s 9970.]